Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 2.

SALES

Law Journals and Reviews

Contracts and Commercial Law. 2 UH L. Rev. 247.

PART 1.
SHORT TITLE, GENERAL CONSTRUCTION AND SUBJECT MATTER

§490:2-101 Short title. This article
shall be known and may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code--Sales. [L 1965, c
208, §2-101; HRS §490:2-101]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next